Utah statutes.
59-10-136.   Domicile -- Temporary absence from state.

(1) (a)  An individual is considered to have domicile in this state if:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a dependent with respect to whom the individual or the individual's spouse claims a personal exemption on the individual's or individual's spouse's federal individual income tax return is enrolled in a public kindergarten, public elementary school, or public secondary school in this state; or

(ii)  the individual or the individual's spouse is a resident student in accordance with Section 53B-8-102 who is enrolled in an institution of higher education described in Section 53B-2-101 in this state.

(b)  The determination of whether an individual is considered to have domicile in this state may not be determined in accordance with Subsection (1)(a)(i) if the individual:

(i)  is the noncustodial parent of a dependent:

(A)  with respect to whom the individual claims a personal exemption on the individual's federal individual income tax return; and

(B)  who is enrolled in a public kindergarten, public elementary school, or public secondary school in this state; and

(ii)  is divorced from the custodial parent of the dependent described in Subsection (1)(b)(i).

(2)  There is a rebuttable presumption that an individual is considered to have domicile in this state if:

(a)  the individual or the individual's spouse claims a residential exemption in accordance with Chapter 2, Property Tax Act, for that individual's or individual's spouse's primary residence;

(b)  the individual or the individual's spouse is registered to vote in this state in accordance with Title 20A, Chapter 2, Voter Registration; or

(c)  the individual or the individual's spouse asserts residency in this state for purposes of filing an individual income tax return under this chapter, including asserting that the individual or the individual's spouse is a part-year resident of this state for the portion of the taxable year for which the individual or the individual's spouse is a resident of this state.

(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), if the requirements of Subsection (1) or (2) are not met for an individual to be considered to have domicile in this state, the individual is considered to have domicile in this state if:

(i)  the individual or the individual's spouse has a permanent home in this state to which the individual or the individual's spouse intends to return after being absent; and

(ii)  the individual or the individual's spouse has voluntarily fixed the individual's or the individual's spouse's habitation in this state, not for a special or temporary purpose, but with the intent of making a permanent home.

(b)  The determination of whether an individual is considered to have domicile in this state under Subsection (3)(a) shall be based on the preponderance of the evidence, taking into consideration the totality of the following facts and circumstances:

(i)  whether the individual or the individual's spouse has a driver license in this state;

(ii)  whether a dependent with respect to whom the individual or the individual's spouse claims a personal exemption on the individual's or individual's spouse's federal individual income tax return is a resident student in accordance with Section 53B-8-102 who is enrolled in an institution of higher education described in Section 53B-2-101 in this state;

(iii)  the nature and quality of the living accommodations that the individual or the individual's spouse has in this state as compared to another state;

(iv)  the presence in this state of a spouse or dependent with respect to whom the individual or the individual's spouse claims a personal exemption on the individual's or individual's spouse's federal individual income tax return;

(v)  the physical location in which earned income as defined in Section 32(c)(2), Internal Revenue Code, is earned by the individual or the individual's spouse;

(vi)  the state of registration of a vehicle as defined in Section 59-12-102 owned or leased by the individual or the individual's spouse;

(vii)  whether the individual or the individual's spouse is a member of a church, a club, or another similar organization in this state;

(viii)  whether the individual or the individual's spouse lists an address in this state on mail, a telephone listing, a listing in an official government publication, other correspondence, or another similar item;

(ix)  whether the individual or the individual's spouse lists an address in this state on a state or federal tax return;

(x)  whether the individual or the individual's spouse asserts residency in this state on a document, other than an individual income tax return filed under this chapter, filed with or provided to a court or other governmental entity;

(xi)  the failure of an individual or the individual's spouse to obtain a permit or license normally required of a resident of the state for which the individual or the individual's spouse asserts to have domicile; or

(xii)  whether the individual is an individual described in Subsection (1)(b).

(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) through (3) and subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (4), an individual is not considered to have domicile in this state if the individual meets the following qualifications:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(A), the individual and the individual's spouse are absent from the state for at least 761 consecutive days; and

(ii)  during the time period described in Subsection (4)(a)(i), neither the individual nor the individual's spouse:

(A)  return to this state for more than 30 days in a calendar year;

(B)  claim a personal exemption on the individual's or individual's spouse's federal individual income tax return with respect to a dependent who is enrolled in a public kindergarten, public elementary school, or public secondary school in this state, unless the individual is an individual described in Subsection (1)(b);

(C)  are resident students in accordance with Section 53B-8-102 who are enrolled in an institution of higher education described in Section 53B-2-101 in this state;

(D)  claim a residential exemption in accordance with Chapter 2, Property Tax Act, for that individual's or individual's spouse's primary residence; or

(E)  assert that this state is the individual's or the individual's spouse's tax home for federal individual income tax purposes.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), an individual that meets the qualifications of Subsection (4)(a) to not be considered to have domicile in this state may elect to be considered to have domicile in this state by filing an individual income tax return in this state as a resident individual.

(c)  For purposes of Subsection (4)(a), an absence from the state:

(i)  begins on the later of the date:

(A)  the individual leaves this state; or

(B)  the individual's spouse leaves this state; and

(ii)  ends on the date the individual or the individual's spouse returns to this state if the individual or the individual's spouse remains in this state for more than 30 days in a calendar year.

(d)  An individual shall file an individual income tax return or amended individual income tax return under this chapter and pay any applicable interest imposed under Section 59-1-402 if:

(i)  the individual did not file an individual income tax return or amended individual income tax return under this chapter based on the individual's belief that the individual has met the qualifications of Subsection (4)(a) to not be considered to have domicile in this state; and

(ii)  the individual or the individual's spouse fails to meet a qualification of Subsection (4)(a) to not be considered to have domicile in this state.

(e) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(e)(ii), an individual that files an individual income tax return or amended individual income tax return under Subsection (4)(d) shall pay any applicable penalty imposed under Section 59-1-401.

(ii)  The commission shall waive the penalties under Subsections 59-1-401(2), (3), and (5) if an individual who is required by Subsection (4)(d) to file an individual income tax return or amended individual income tax return under this chapter:

(A)  files the individual income tax return or amended individual income tax return within 105 days after the individual fails to meet a qualification of Subsection (4)(a) to not be considered to have domicile in this state; and

(B)  within the 105-day period described in Subsection (4)(e)(ii)(A), pays in full the tax due on the return, any interest imposed under Section 59-1-402, and any applicable penalty imposed under Section 59-1-401, except for a penalty under Subsection 59-1-401(2), (3), or (5).

(5) (a)  If an individual is considered to have domicile in this state in accordance with this section, the individual's spouse is considered to have domicile in this state.

(b)  For purposes of this section, an individual is not considered to have a spouse if:

(i)  the individual is legally separated or divorced from the spouse; or

(ii)  the individual and the individual's spouse claim married filing separately filing status for purposes of filing a federal individual income tax return for the taxable year.

(c)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b)(ii), for purposes of this section, an individual's filing status on a federal individual income tax return or a return filed under this chapter may not be considered in determining whether an individual has a spouse.

(6)  For purposes of this section, whether or not an individual or the individual's spouse claims a property tax residential exemption under Chapter 2, Property Tax Act, for the residential property that is the primary residence of a tenant of the individual or the individual's spouse may not be considered in determining domicile in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 410, 2011 General Session

